Hawaii statutes.
§490:2-703 Seller's remedies in general.
Where the buyer wrongfully rejects or revokes acceptance of goods or fails to
make a payment due on or before delivery or repudiates with respect to a part
or the whole, then with respect to any goods directly affected and, if the
breach is of the whole contract (section 490:2-612), then also with respect to
the whole undelivered balance, the aggrieved seller may:

(a) Withhold delivery of such goods;

(b) Stop delivery by any bailee as hereafter provided
(section 490:2-705);

(c) Proceed under the next section respecting goods
still unidentified to the contract;

(d) Resell and recover damages as hereafter provided
(section 490:2-706);

(e) Recover damages for nonacceptance (section
490:2-708) or in a proper case the price (section 490:2-709);

(f) Cancel. [L 1965, c 208, §2-703; HRS §490:2-703]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next